Maine, session 132, LD1464.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §701-B is enacted to read:
§701-B. Alternate assessment
Notwithstanding section 701-A and consistent with the Constitution of Maine, Article
IX, Section 8, an alternative rate of assessment may be established as provided in this
section.
1. Different rates of tax for different categories of assessed real property. An
assessor, in determining just value, may apply a different tax rate to each of the following
categories of assessed real property:
A. Land; and
B. Buildings and other improvements.
In establishing the different rates allowed by this subsection, an assessor may use for
guidance the provisions of section 701-A.
2. Equal application of rates. The rates imposed on each category of assessed real
property specified in subsection 1 must be applied equally within each primary assessing
area, as defined in section 306, subsection 4.
3. Use of other tax benefit programs. This section may not be construed to prohibit
the use of any other tax benefit program established in law that would otherwise be
available to the owner of the real property.
Sec. 2. Application. This Act applies to property tax years beginning on or after
April 1, 2026.